Massachusetts, session 194th, S1534.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 112 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4 the following sections:-
Section 4A. (a) For the purposes of sections 4A and 4B, the following words shall have
the following meanings:-
“Board of Registration in Medicine”, the board of registration in medicine established
pursuant to section 10 of chapter 13.
“Board of Registration in Nursing”, the board of registration in nursing established
pursuant to section 13 of chapter 13.
“Clinician”, a physician, nurse, physician assistant, psychologist, or independent clinical
social worker, who is licensed to provide health services and registered in the commonwealth
pursuant to chapter 112 to provide such services, and any other individual who is licensed to
of 8

provide health services and registered in the commonwealth pursuant to chapter 112 to provide
such services.
“Clinician with independent practice authority”, a physician registered to practice
medicine in the commonwealth or a nurse practitioner, psychiatric nurse mental health clinical
specialist, or nurse anesthetist who is registered to practice medicine in the commonwealth and
who has independent practice authority pursuant to sections 80E and 80J of said chapter 112.
“Management services organization,” a business that provides management or
administrative services to a health care provider or provider organization for compensation.
“Health care practice”, a business, regardless of form, through which a clinician with
independent practice authority licensed by the Board of Registration in Medicine or the Board of
Registration in Nursing offers health services; provided, however, that health care practice shall
not include any entity that holds a license issued by the department of public health pursuant to
sections 51, 51M, 51N or 52 of chapter 111.
“Physician”, a doctor of medicine or doctor of osteopathy who is registered to practice
medicine in the commonwealth pursuant to section 2 of chapter 112.
(b) A clinician with independent practice authority may practice at a health care practice
that meets the following requirements: (1) the health care practice is wholly owned and
controlled by one or more clinicians with independent practice authority who hold a certificate of
registration that (i) is issued by the board of registration in medicine or the board of registration
in nursing pursuant to the requirements of sections 2 and 80B of this chapter, and (ii) has not
been suspended or revoked; or (2) the health care practice is conducted through a business
organization formed as: (i) a professional corporation pursuant to chapter 156A; (ii) a nonprofit
of 8

organization, a nonprofit hospital services corporation organized under chapter 176A, a nonprofit
medical services corporation organized under chapter 176B; (iii) a limited liability company
organized under chapter 156C; provided, however, that there are no LLC provisions limiting or
eliminating the licensee's liability for intentional tort or negligence; (iv) a partnership organized
under chapter 108A, including, but not limited to, a registered limited liability partnership;
provided, however, that the partnership has no provisions limiting or eliminating the licensee's
liability for intentional torts or negligence; or (v) an organization similar to those organizations
described in clauses (i) through (iv) of this subsection and organized under a comparable law of
any other United States jurisdiction; organized under a comparable law of any other jurisdiction
within the United States; provided, however, that all shares of the organization shall be owned by
clinicians with independent practice authority.
(c) It shall constitute the unauthorized practice of medicine in violation of section 6 of
this chapter for any person or entity to own a health care practice other than a clinician with
independent practice authority who holds a certificate of registration that is issued by the board
of registration in medicine or the board of registration in nursing pursuant to the requirements of
sections 2 or 80B and has not been suspended or revoked. This section shall not apply to a health
care facility or entity that holds a license issued by the department of public health pursuant to
sections 51, 51M, 51N or 52 of chapter 111.
(d)(1) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a clinician with independent practice
authority from practicing medicine as an employee of a health care facility or entity that holds a
license issued by the department of public health pursuant to sections 51, 51M, 51N or 52 of
chapter 111.
of 8

(2) An entity that provides compensation to one or more clinicians with independent
practice authority, including, but not limited to a health care facility licensed pursuant to sections
51, 51M, 51N or 51, shall not directly or indirectly interfere with, control, or otherwise direct the
professional judgment or clinical decisions of such clinicians with independent practice
authority. Conduct prohibited under this paragraph shall include, but not be limited to,
controlling, either directly or indirectly through discipline, punishment, threats, adverse
employment actions, coercion, retaliation or excessive pressure, regarding: (i) the amount of time
spent with patients, including the time permitted to triage patients in the emergency department
or evaluate admitted patients; (ii) the time period within which a patient must be discharged; (iii)
decisions involving the patient’s clinical status, including, but not limited to, whether the patient
should be kept in observation status, whether the patient should receive palliative care and where
the patient should be placed upon discharge; (iv) the diagnosis, diagnostic terminology or codes
that are entered into the medical record; or (v) any other conduct the department of public health
determines by regulation would interfere with, control or otherwise direct the professional
judgement or clinical decisions of clinicians with independent practice authority. Such entities
shall not limit the range of clinical orders available to clinicians either directly or by configuring
the medical record to prohibit or significantly limit the clinical order options available.
Nondisclosure or non-disparagement agreements regarding subsections (i) through (v), inclusive,
between a clinician with independent practice authority and any person or entity shall be
considered void and unenforceable. If a court of competent jurisdiction finds a policy, contract or
contract provision void and unenforceable pursuant to this section, the court shall award the
plaintiff reasonable attorney’s fees and costs. Nothing in this section shall limit the ability of any
of 8

person to bring any action relating to defamation, disclosure of confidential or proprietary
information or trade secrets or similar torts.
(e) All health care practices shall provide written certification that the health care practice
meets the requirements in this section to the board of registration in medicine or the board of
registration in nursing at the time of formation and on a biennial basis thereafter. If a practice’s
owners consist of individuals registered solely with the board of registration in medicine or the
board of registration in nursing, the practice shall provide the certification to the applicable
board. If the practice’s owners consist of individuals registered with both boards, the practice
shall provide the certification to the board of registration in medicine, which shall transmit a
copy to the board of registration in nursing. Health care practices shall, at the time that such
clinicians with independent practice authority are hired or affiliated with the practice and within
30 days of providing certification to the applicable board pursuant to this section, provide a copy
of the most recent certification to all clinicians with independent practice authority who: (i)
engage in providing health services at the practice; and (ii) do not hold any ownership interest in
the practice.
(f) All health care practices shall file with the applicable board a registration application
containing such information as the board may reasonably require, including, but not limited to:
(i) the identity of the applicant and of the clinicians with independent practice authority which
constitute the practice; (ii) any management services organization under contract with the health
care practice; (iii) a certified copy of the health care practice’s certificate of organization, if any,
as filed with the secretary of the commonwealth, or any applicable partnership agreement; (iv)
the address of the health care practice; (v) the services provided by the health care practice; and
100 (vi) any information the board, in consultation with the health policy commission and the center
of 8

101 for health information and analysis, deems relevant for the state health plan and focused
102 assessments pursuant to section 22 of chapter 6D and the health care resources inventory
103 pursuant to section 9 of chapter 12C. The application shall be accompanied by a fee in an amount
104 to be determined pursuant to section 3B of chapter 7. All health care practices registered in the
105 commonwealth shall renew their certificates of registration with the board every 2 years. The
106 board shall share information relevant to the state health plan and focused assessments pursuant
107 to section 22 of chapter 6D with the commission and information relevant to the health care
108 resources inventory pursuant to section 9 of section 12C with the center.
109 (g) All health care practices with more than 1 clinician with independent practice
110 authority that constitutes the practice shall designate a clinician with independent practice
111 authority at the practice to serve as medical director; provided, however, that the designated
112 clinician shall hold a certificate of registration that (i) is issued by the Board of Registration in
113 Medicine or the Board of Registration in Nursing pursuant to the requirements of sections 2 or
114 80B of this chapter that is not suspended or revoked; and (2) is present in the state and is
115 substantially engaged in delivering care or managing the practice. The director shall be
116 responsible for implementing policies and procedures to ensure compliance with local
117 ordinances and state and federal statutes and regulations governing the practice of medicine or
118 the practice of nursing, including regulations promulgated and policies established by the
119 applicable board. The board may impose discipline against the licenses of the medical director
120 and the clinicians with independent practice authority who own and control the health care
121 practice for failure of the practice to comply with local ordinances and state and federal statutes
122 and regulations governing the practice of medicine or the practice of nursing, including
123 regulations promulgated and policies established by the applicable board.
of 8

124 (h) The board of registration in medicine and board of registration in nursing may
125 promulgate regulations to establish minimum requirements for the conduct of a health care
126 practice, including, but not limited to: (i) compliance with section 4A of chapter 112; (ii)
127 maintenance and access to medical records; and (iii) in the event of a planned closure of the
128 health care practice or an unplanned event that prevents the health care practice from continuing
129 operations, the development of a continuity plan to: (1) ensure access to medical records, (2)
130 provide notice to patients; and (3) assist patients with transitioning to a new provider. If a
131 practice’s owners consist of individuals registered solely with the board of registration in
132 medicine or the board of registration in nursing, the practice shall comply with the applicable
133 board’s regulations. If the practice’s owners consist of individuals registered with both boards,
134 the practice shall comply with the regulations issued by the board of registration in medicine.
135 Each board shall consult with the other when promulgating regulations.
136 Section 4B. (a) A health care practice shall maintain ultimate control over clinical
137 decisions.
138 (b) A management services organization shall not exercise control over, or be delegated
139 the power to do, any of the following: (i) owning or otherwise determining the content of patient
140 medical records; (ii) selecting, hiring or firing any owner of or clinician associated with the
141 health care practice based, in whole or in part, on clinical competency or proficiency; (iii) setting
142 the parameters under which a practice shall enter into contractual relationships with third-party
143 payers; (iiiv) setting the parameters under which a practice shall enter into contractual
144 relationships with clinicians for the delivery of care; (iv) making final decisions regarding coding
145 and billing procedures for patient care services; or (vi) approving the selection of medical
146 equipment and medical supplies for the practice.
of 8

147 (c) A health care practice shall maintain ultimate decision-making authority over: (i)
148 personnel decisions involving clinicians, including, but not limited to, employment status,
149 compensation, hours or working conditions; (ii) coding or billing decisions; (iii) the selection and
150 use of property, including, but not limited to, real property, medical equipment or medical
151 supplies for the delivery of patient care services; (iv) the number of patients seen in a given
152 period of time or the amount of time spent with each patient; (v) the appropriate diagnostic test
153 for medical conditions; (vi) the use of patient medical records; and (vii) referral decisions.
154 (d) A violation of this section shall constitute the unauthorized practice of medicine in
155 violation of section 6 or the unauthorized practice of nursing in violation of section 80E, 80H or
156 80J. Any provision of a contract or agreement that has the effect of violating this section shall be
157 void and unenforceable. If a court of competent jurisdiction finds a policy, contract or contract
158 provision void and unenforceable pursuant to this section, the court shall award the plaintiff
159 reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.
160 (e) The department of public health shall promulgate regulations to effectuate the
161 purposes of this section.
of 8